Ohio, session 136, HB318.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 5162.21 and 5162.211 of the 4
Revised Code be amended to read as follows: 5
Sec. 5162.21. (A) As used in this section and section 6
5162.211 of the Revised Code: 7
(1) "Estate" includes both of the following: 8
(a) All real and personal property and other assets to be 9
administered under Title XXI of the Revised Code and property 10
that would be administered under that title if not for section 11
2113.03 or 2113.031 of the Revised Code; 12
(b) Any other real and personal property and other assets 13
in which an individual had any legal title or interest at the 14
time of death (to the extent of the interest), including assets 15
conveyed to a survivor, heir, or assign of the individual 16
through joint tenancy, tenancy in common, survivorship, life 17
estate, living trust, or other arrangement. 18

H. B. No. 318 Page 2
As Introduced
(2) "Institution" means a nursing facility, ICF/IID, or a 19
medical institution. 20
(3) "Permanently institutionalized individual" means an 21
individual to whom all of the following apply: 22
(a) Is an inpatient in an institution; 23
(b) Is required, as a condition of the medicaid program 24
paying for the individual's services in the institution, to 25
spend for costs of medical or nursing care all of the 26
individual's income except for an amount for personal needs 27
specified by the department of medicaid; 28
(c) Cannot reasonably be expected to be discharged from 29
the institution and return home as determined by the department 30
of medicaid. 31
(4) "Qualified state long-term care insurance partnership 32
program" means the program established under section 5164.86 of 33
the Revised Code. 34
(5) "Time of death" shall not be construed to mean a time 35
after which a legal title or interest in real or personal 36
property or other asset may pass by survivorship or other 37
operation of law due to the death of the decedent or terminate 38
by reason of the decedent's death. 39
(B) To the extent permitted by federal law, the department 40
of medicaid shall institute a medicaid estate recovery program 41
under which the department shall, except as provided in 42
divisions (C) and (E) of this section, and subject to division 43
(D) of this section, do all both of the following: 44
(1) For the costs of medicaid services the medicaid 45
program correctly paid or will pay on behalf of a permanently 46

H. B. No. 318 Page 3
As Introduced
institutionalized individual of any age, seek adjustment or 47
recovery from the individual's estate or on the sale of property 48
of the individual or spouse that is subject to a lien imposed 49
under section 5162.211 of the Revised Code; 50
(2) For the costs of medicaid services described in 51
section 1917(b)(1)(B)(i) of the "Social Security Act," 42 U.S.C. 52
1396p(b)(1)(B)(i), that the medicaid program correctly paid or 53
will pay on behalf of an individual fifty-five years of age or 54
older who is not a permanently institutionalized individual, 55
seek adjustment or recovery from the individual's estate; 56
(3) Seek adjustment or recovery from the estate of other 57
individuals as permitted by federal law. 58
(C)(1) No adjustment or recovery may be made under 59
division (B)(1) of this section from a permanently 60
institutionalized individual's estate or on the sale of property 61
of a permanently institutionalized individual that is subject to 62
a lien imposed under section 5162.211 of the Revised Code or 63
under division (B)(2) or (3) of this section from an 64
individual's estate while either of the following are alive: 65
(a) The spouse of the permanently institutionalized 66
individual or individual; 67
(b) The son or daughter of a permanently institutionalized 68
individual or individual if the son or daughter is under age 69
twenty-one or, under section 1614 of the "Social Security Act," 70
section 1614, 42 U.S.C. 1382c, is considered blind or disabled. 71
(2) No adjustment or recovery may be made under division 72
(B)(1) of this section from a permanently institutionalized 73
individual's home that is subject to a lien imposed under 74
section 5162.211 of the Revised Code while either of the 75

H. B. No. 318 Page 4
As Introduced
following lawfully reside in the home: 76
(a) The permanently institutionalized individual's sibling 77
who resided in the home for at least one year immediately before 78
the date of the permanently institutionalized individual's 79
admission to the institution and on a continuous basis since 80
that time; 81
(b) The permanently institutionalized individual's son or 82
daughter who provided care to the permanently institutionalized 83
individual that delayed the permanently institutionalized 84
individual's institutionalization and resided in the home for at 85
least two years immediately before the date of the permanently 86
institutionalized individual's admission to the institution and 87
on a continuous basis since that time. 88
(D) In the case of a participant of the qualified state 89
long-term care insurance partnership program, adjustment or 90
recovery required by this section may be reduced in accordance 91
with rules authorized by division (G) of this section. 92
(E) The department shall, in accordance with procedures 93
and criteria established in rules authorized by division (G) of 94
this section, waive seeking an adjustment or recovery otherwise 95
required by this section if the medicaid director determines 96
that adjustment or recovery would work an undue hardship. The 97
department may limit the duration of the waiver to the period 98
during which the undue hardship exists. 99
(F) For the purpose of determining whether an individual 100
meets the definition of "permanently institutionalized 101
individual" established for this section, a rebuttable 102
presumption exists that the individual cannot reasonably be 103
expected to be discharged from an institution and return home if 104

H. B. No. 318 Page 5
As Introduced
either of the following is the case: 105
(1) The individual declares that he or she does not intend 106
to return home. 107
(2) The individual has been an inpatient in an institution 108
for at least six months. 109
(G) Rules adopted under section 5162.02 of the Revised 110
Code shall do both of the following: 111
(1) For the purpose of division (D) of this section and 112
consistent with section 1917(b)(1)(C) of the "Social Security 113
Act," section 1917(b)(1)(C), 42 U.S.C. 1396p(b)(1)(C), provide 114
for reducing an adjustment or recovery in the case of a 115
participant of the qualified state long-term care insurance 116
partnership program; 117
(2) For the purpose of division (E) of this section and 118
consistent with the standards specified by the United States 119
secretary of health and human services under section 1917(b)(3) 120
of the "Social Security Act," section 1917(b)(3), 42 U.S.C. 121
1396p(b)(3), establish procedures and criteria for waiving 122
adjustment or recovery due to an undue hardship or for either of 123
the following: 124
(a) Beginning on the effective date of this amendment, 125
waiving adjustment or recovery when the costs of medicaid 126
services the medicaid program correctly paid or will pay on 127
behalf of an individual are less than twenty thousand dollars. 128
In subsequent years, the department shall adjust the amount 129
specified in this division for inflation. 130
(b) Waiving adjustment or recovery when the costs of 131
medicaid services the medicaid program correctly paid or will 132
pay on behalf of an individual do not exceed the administrative 133

H. B. No. 318 Page 6
As Introduced
costs of making the adjustment or recovery. 134
Sec. 5162.211. (A) Except as provided in division (B) of 135
this section and section 5162.23 of the Revised Code, no lien 136
may be imposed against the property of an individual before the 137
individual's death on account of medicaid services correctly 138
paid or to be paid on the individual's behalf. 139
(B) Except as provided in division (C) of this section, 140
the department of medicaid may impose a lien against the real 141
property of a medicaid recipient who is a permanently 142
institutionalized individual and against the real property of 143
the recipient's spouse, including any real property that is 144
jointly held by the recipient and spouse. The lien may be 145
imposed on account of medicaid paid or to be paid on the 146
recipient's behalf. A lien imposed against the real property of 147
a medicaid recipient under this section shall not exceed 148
seventy-five per cent of the assessed value of the property. 149
(C) No lien may be imposed under division (B) of this 150
section against the home of a medicaid recipient if any of the 151
following lawfully resides in the home: 152
(1) The recipient's spouse; 153
(2) The recipient's son or daughter who is under twenty- 154
one years of age or, under section 1614 of the "Social Security 155
Act," section 1614, 42 U.S.C. 1382c, considered to be blind or 156
disabled; 157
(3) The recipient's sibling who has an equity interest in 158
the home and resided in the home for at least one year 159
immediately before the date of the recipient's admission to the 160
institution. 161
(D) The medicaid director or a person designated by the 162

H. B. No. 318 Page 7
As Introduced
director shall sign a certificate to effectuate a lien required 163
to be imposed under this section. The county department of job 164
and family services shall file for recording and indexing the 165
certificate, or a certified copy, in the real estate mortgage 166
records in the office of the county recorder in every county in 167
which real property of the recipient or spouse is situated. From 168
the time of filing the certificate in the office of the county 169
recorder, the lien attaches to all real property of the 170
recipient or spouse described in the certificate for all amounts 171
for which adjustment or recovery may be made under section 172
5162.21 of the Revised Code and, except as provided in division 173
(E) of this section, shall remain a lien until satisfied. 174
Upon filing the certificate in the office of the recorder, 175
all persons are charged with notice of the lien and the rights 176
of the department of medicaid thereunder. 177
The county recorder shall keep a record of every 178
certificate filed showing its date, the time of filing, the name 179
and residence of the recipient or spouse, and any release, 180
waivers, or satisfaction of the lien. 181
The priority of the lien shall be established in 182
accordance with state and federal law. 183
The department may waive the priority of its lien to 184
provide for the costs of the last illness as determined by the 185
department, administration, attorney fees, administrator fees, a 186
sum for the payment of the costs of burial, which shall be 187
computed by deducting from five hundred dollars whatever amount 188
is available for the same purpose from all other sources, and a 189
similar sum for the spouse of the decedent. 190
(E) A lien imposed with respect to a medicaid recipient 191

H. B. No. 318 Page 8
As Introduced
under this section shall dissolve on the recipient's discharge 192
from the institution and return home. 193
Section 2. That existing sections 5162.21 and 5162.211 of 194
the Revised Code are hereby repealed. 195